Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9018

Semiannual report required—Inspection fees—Reports—Late fees—Confidentiality.

(1) Every registrant or licensee must file a semiannual report on forms provided by the department setting forth the number of tons of commercial feed distributed in or into this state. The report must be filed regardless of the amount of feed distributed or inspection fees owed. The report must include:

(a) The name and mailing address of the registrant or licensee;

(b) The physical address of the registrant or licensee;

(c) The name, contact information, and signature of the person filing the report;

(d) The total number of tons distributed in or into this state;

(e) The total number of tons on which the registrant or licensee is paying;

(f) If the registrant or licensee is not paying inspection fees on all commercial feed he or she distributed in or into this state, information regarding the registrants or licensees that are responsible for paying the inspection fees and the number of tons involved; and

(g) Other information required by the department by rule.

(2) Except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this section, each initial distributor or responsible buyer must pay to the department an inspection fee on all commercial feed distributed by such person during the reporting period. The inspection fee must accompany the report required in subsection (1) of this section. The inspection fee shall be not less than four cents nor more than twelve cents per ton as prescribed by the department by rule. These fees shall be used for enforcement and administration of this chapter and its rules.

(3) The initial distributor is not required to pay an inspection fee for commercial feed he or she distributed to a responsible buyer.

(4) In a situation where a responsible buyer is distributing to another responsible buyer, the inspection fee must be paid by the last responsible buyer to distribute the commercial feed.

(5) The initial distributor or responsible buyer is not required to pay an inspection fee for: (a) Pet food and specialty pet food distributed in packages weighing less than ten pounds; (b) distribution of bona fide experimental feeds on which accurate records and experimental programs are maintained; (c) commercial feed distributed to points outside this state; and (d) food processing by-products from fruit, vegetable, or potato processing plants, freezing or dehydrating facilities, or juice or jelly preserving plants.

(6) Tonnage will be reported and inspection fees will be paid on (a) by-products or products of sugar refineries; and (b) materials used in the preparation of pet foods and specialty pet food.

(7)(a) Each person made responsible by this chapter for filing a report or paying inspection fees must do so according to the following schedule:

(i) For the period January 1st through June 30th of each year, the report and inspection fees are due on July 31st of that year; and

(ii) For the period July 1st through December 31st of each year, the report and inspection fees are due on January 31st of the following year.

(b) If a complete report is not received by the due date or the appropriate inspection fees are not received by the due date, the person responsible for filing the report or paying the inspection fee must pay a late fee equal to fifteen percent of the inspection fee owed or fifty dollars, whichever is greater.

(c) The department may cancel the registration of a person's commercial feed or may cancel a person's commercial feed license if that person fails to pay the late fee. The applicant or licensee may request a hearing as authorized under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(8) If inspection fees are owed, the minimum inspection fee is twelve dollars and fifty cents.

(9) For the purpose of verifying the accuracy of reports and payment of appropriate inspection fees, the department may examine, at reasonable times, a registrant's or licensee's distribution records and may require each registrant or licensee to maintain records or file additional reports. These records must be maintained in usable condition by the registrant or licensee for a period of three years unless by rule this retention period is extended and must be submitted to the department upon request.

(10) The report required by subsection (1) of this section shall not be a public record, and any information given in such report which would reveal the business operation of the person making the report is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW, and information obtained by the department from other governmental agencies or other sources that is used to verify information received in the report is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW. However, this subsection does not prevent the use of information concerning the business operation of a person if any action, suit, or proceeding instituted under the authority of this chapter, including any civil action for collection of unpaid inspection fees, which action is hereby authorized and which shall be as an action at law in the name of the director of the department.

(11) Any commercial feed obtained by a consumer or contract feeder outside the jurisdiction of this state and brought into this state for use is subject to all the provisions of this chapter, including inspection fees.

[ 2006 c 209 s 2; 2005 c 18 s 7; 1995 c 374 s 38; 1982 c 177 s 3; 1981 c 297 s 17; 1979 c 91 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 5; 1967 c 240 s 32; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Effective date—1981 c 297 s 17: "Section 17 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1981." [ 1981 c 297 s 44.]

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.

Effective date—1979 c 91: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1980." [ 1979 c 91 s 2.]

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: See note following RCW 15.13.470.

Severability—1967 c 240: See note following RCW 43.23.010.